Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.110

Health food stores exempted.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to owners, operators or employees of health food stores provided the owners, operators or employees do not represent themselves to be certified dietitians or certified nutritionists.

[ 1988 c 277 s 11.]